Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4728.01
Commission; mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse services; service coordination.

The commission shall not deliver direct mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse services but shall assist in obtaining full access to comprehensive mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse services for deaf or hard of hearing persons by providing service coordination for deaf or hard of hearing persons with mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse disorders including:

(1) Meeting the communication needs of deaf or hard of hearing persons including interpreter services and auxiliary aids;

(2) Education and training for persons who provide treatment for mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse disorders to deaf or hard of hearing persons; and

(3) Placement of assistive-listening devices for deaf or hard of hearing persons in mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse treatment facilities.

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 19.